Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB583.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, if a school district elects to:
(a) Provide healthcare services through a licensed or certified healthcare
professional, the school district shall bill the school-based Medicaid
program for medically necessary services provided to Medicaid enrolled
students for whom the district has obtained parental consent to bill; and
(b) Contract with a third-party billing vendor to bill the school-based Medicaid
program for covered services, the school district shall contract with a
vendor that has the capacity to submit Medicaid billing claims for all codes
listed in the current Medicaid Technical Assistance Guide, including all
codes within the scope of practice of nurse practitioners.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, school nurses shall be
eligible to receive preventative oral health services training provided by the
Department for Public Health.
(b) School districts shall be permitted to bill for preventative oral health
services under the school-based Medicaid program when providing
preventative oral health services that are within the scope of practice of a
school nurse to Medicaid enrolled students for whom the district has
obtained parental consent to bill.
(c) Preventative oral health services provided under this subsection shall be:
1. Limited to services within the scope of practice for school nurses
established under KRS Chapter 314; and
2. Provided in accordance to protocols developed by the Department for
Public Health in consultation with the Kentucky Board of Dentistry.
Page 1 of 2
HB058310.100 - 1429 - XXXX 3/24/2026 3:40 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 583/GA
(3) This section shall not:
(a) Apply to a school district that contracts with its local health department, a
federally qualified health center, or any other community-based provider
for school healthcare services;
(b) Be interpreted as requiring a school district to provide healthcare services
through a school nurse;
(c) Be construed or interpreted as modifying or superseding the school health
requirements established pursuant to KRS 156.160 and administrative
regulations promulgated thereunder; or
(d) Apply to a school that utilizes federal funds to employ a healthcare provider
to provide healthcare services to students.
Page 2 of 2
HB058310.100 - 1429 - XXXX 3/24/2026 3:40 PM GA